Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.648

Publicly owned vehicles, vessels, and construction equipment—Fuel usage—Advisory committee—Tires.

(1) Effective June 1, 2015, all state agencies, to the extent determined practicable by the rules adopted by the department of commerce pursuant to RCW 43.325.080, are required to satisfy one hundred percent of their fuel usage for operating publicly owned vessels, vehicles, and construction equipment from electricity or biofuel. Compressed natural gas, liquefied natural gas, or propane may be substituted for electricity or biofuel if the department of commerce determines that electricity and biofuel are not reasonably available.

(2)(a) Effective June 1, 2018, all local government subdivisions of the state, to the extent determined practicable by the rules adopted by the department of commerce pursuant to RCW 43.325.080, are required to satisfy one hundred percent of their fuel usage for operating publicly owned vessels, vehicles, and construction equipment from electricity or biofuel. The department of commerce shall convene an advisory committee of representatives of local government subdivisions, representatives from organizations representing each local government subdivision, and either (i) an electric utility or (ii) a natural gas utility, or both, to work with the department to develop the rules. The department may invite additional stakeholders to participate in the advisory committee as needed and determined by the department.

(b) The following are exempt from this requirement: (i) Transit agencies using compressed natural gas on June 1, 2018, and (ii) engine retrofits that would void warranties. Nothing in this section is intended to require the replacement of equipment before the end of its useful life. Compressed natural gas, liquefied natural gas, or propane may be substituted for electricity or biofuel if the department of commerce determines that electricity and biofuel are not reasonably available.

(c)(i) Rules adopted pursuant to RCW 43.325.080 must provide the authority for local government subdivisions to elect to exempt police, fire, and other emergency response vehicles, including utility vehicles frequently used for emergency response, from the fuel usage requirement in (a) of this subsection.

(ii) Prior to executing its authority under (c)(i) of this subsection, a local government subdivision must provide notice to the department of commerce of the exemption. The notice must include the rationale for the exemption and an explanation of how the exemption is consistent with rules adopted by the department of commerce.

(d) Before June 1, 2018, local government subdivisions purchasing vessels, vehicles, and construction equipment capable of using biodiesel must request warranty protection for the highest level of biodiesel the vessel, vehicle, or construction equipment is capable of using, up to one hundred percent biodiesel, as long as the costs are reasonably equal to a vessel, vehicle, or construction equipment that is not warranted to use up to one hundred percent biodiesel.

(3) In order to phase in this transition for the state, all state agencies, to the extent determined practicable by the department of commerce by rules adopted pursuant to RCW 43.325.080, are required to achieve forty percent fuel usage for operating publicly owned vessels, vehicles, and construction equipment from electricity or biofuel by June 1, 2013. Compressed natural gas, liquefied natural gas, or propane may be substituted for electricity or biofuel if the department of commerce determines that electricity and biofuel are not reasonably available. The department of enterprise services, in consultation with the department of commerce, shall report to the governor and the legislature by December 1, 2013, on what percentage of the state's fuel usage is from electricity or biofuel.

(4) Except for cars owned or operated by the Washington state patrol, when tires on vehicles in the state's motor vehicle fleet are replaced, they must be replaced with tires that have the same or better rolling resistance as the original tires.

(5) By December 31, 2015, the state must, to the extent practicable, install electrical outlets capable of charging electric vehicles in each of the state's fleet parking and maintenance facilities.

(6) The department of transportation's obligations under subsection (3) of this section are subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for the specific purpose identified in subsection (3) of this section.

(7) The department of transportation's obligations under subsection (5) of this section are subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for the specific purpose identified in subsection (5) of this section unless the department receives federal or private funds for the specific purpose identified in subsection (5) of this section.

(8) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Battery charging station" means an electrical component assembly or cluster of component assemblies designed specifically to charge batteries within electric vehicles, which meet or exceed any standards, codes, and regulations set forth by chapter 19.28 RCW and consistent with rules adopted under RCW 19.27.540.

(b) "Battery exchange station" means a fully automated facility that will enable an electric vehicle with a swappable battery to enter a drive lane and exchange the depleted battery with a fully charged battery through a fully automated process, which meets or exceeds any standards, codes, and regulations set forth by chapter 19.28 RCW and consistent with rules adopted under RCW 19.27.540.

[ 2013 c 328 s 1; 2012 c 171 s 1; 2011 c 353 s 4; 2009 c 459 s 7; 2007 c 348 s 202.]

NOTES:

Intent—2011 c 353: See note following RCW 36.70A.130.

Finding—Purpose—2009 c 459: See note following RCW 47.80.090.

Findings—2007 c 348: See RCW 43.325.005.

Regional transportation planning organizations—Electric vehicle infrastructure: RCW 47.80.090.